test/src/morphology/N-ножницы_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - ножницы M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: но́жницы
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: но́жницы
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: но́жниц
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: но́жницах
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: но́жницам
      ножницы+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: но́жницами
